Wyoming, session 2026, HB0005.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 30-5-129(a)(v) is amended to read:
30-5-129. Oil and gas bonding; rules for operators;
requirements; reports; assessments.
(a) The commission shall promulgate rules to
establish bonding options in addition to those specified in
W.S. 30-5-104(d)(i)(D) for operators requiring bonds for
producing oil or gas in Wyoming. The program required under
this subsection shall be in accordance with all of the
following:
(v) The commission may impose an assessment on
each participating operator on the fair cash market value,
as provided in W.S. 39-14-203, of all oil and gas produced,
sold or transported from the operator's wells in Wyoming
that are covered under this subsection in accordance with
this paragraph. Beginning on July 1, 2025 through June 30,
2030, the assessment shall be zero (0) mills on the dollar.
Beginning July 1, 2030, the commission may impose an
assessment under this paragraph in an amount not to exceed
five-tenths of one (1) mill ($0.0005) on the dollar. All
funds collected under this paragraph shall be deposited in
the separate account established under W.S. 30-5-116(b).
For purposes of accounting and investing, funds collected
under this paragraph shall be accounted for separately. The
state treasurer shall invest funds collected under this
paragraph in accordance with law, and all investment
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0005
ENROLLED ACT NO. 2, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
earnings shall be deposited in the separate account
established under W.S. 30-5-116(b). Funds collected and
investment earnings deposited under this paragraph shall be
expended only on the bonding pool established under
paragraph (iii) or (iv) of this subsection;
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2